District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1402

Definitions.

Repealed.

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 3, 41 DCR 4636
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 8(a), 42 DCR 452
June 6, 1998, D.C. Law 12-115, § 2, 45 DCR 1957
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(j), 57 DCR 181
1981 Ed., § 2-4002.

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Sports and Entertainment Commission Financial Affairs Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-72, February 25, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3364).

For temporary amendment of section, see § 8 (a) of the Recreation Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-20, February 28, 1995, 42 DCR 1175).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Sports and Entertainment Commission Financial Affairs Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-173, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9177).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
Construction of Law 10-152: See note to § 3-1401.